Washington statutes.
RCW 18.170.140

Regulatory provisions exclusive—Authority of the state and political subdivisions.

(1) The provisions of this chapter relating to the licensing for regulatory purposes of private security guards, armed private security guards, and private security companies are exclusive. No governmental subdivision of this state may enact any laws or rules licensing for regulatory purposes such persons, except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section.

(2) This section shall not be construed to prevent a political subdivision of this state from levying a business license fee, business and occupation tax, or other tax upon private security companies if such fees or taxes are levied on other types of businesses within its boundaries.

(3) This section shall not be construed to prevent this state or a political subdivision of this state from licensing or regulating private security companies with respect to activities performed or offered that are not of a security nature.

[ 1991 c 334 s 14.]